Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3303
Purpose of act; legislative intent.

(1) The purpose of the Oil
Pipeline Reclamation Act is to ensure that a pipeline carrier which owns,
constructs, operates, or manages a pipeline through this state for the transportation
of oil is financially responsible for reclamation costs relating to the construction,
operation, and management of the pipeline in this state as prescribed in the
act.

(2) It is the intent
of the Legislature that proper reclamation is accomplished as part of the
oil pipeline construction process, including restoration of areas through
which a pipeline is constructed as close as reasonably practicable to the
condition, contour, and vegetation that existed prior to construction, including
stabilizing disturbed areas, establishing a diverse plant environment of native
grasses and forbs to create a safe and stable landscape, restoring active
cropland to its previous productive capability, mitigating noxious weeds,
and managing invasive plants, unless otherwise agreed to by the landowner.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB845, § 2.